Maryland, session 2025, HB0486.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
28–102.
This title applies only in St. Mary’s County.
28–2802.
(a) (1) A person who violates a law relating to hours or days for the sale of
alcoholic beverages is guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction is subject to imprisonment
or a fine not exceeding $250 or both.
(2) If the Board finds that a person has violated a law relating to licensing
the sale of alcoholic beverages, the Board may:
(i) revoke or suspend the person’s license;
(ii) impose a civil penalty not exceeding [$1,000] $2,500; or
– 1 –

Ch. 787 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(iii) both revoke or suspend the person’s license and impose a civil
penalty not exceeding [$1,000] $2,500.
(b) If an employee of a license holder sells alcoholic beverages to an individual
under the age of 21 years the Board may impose a fine on the employee not exceeding $500
per offense.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 2 –